Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4833.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8123. (1) The forty-third district consists of the cities of Madison Heights, Ferndale, and Hazel Park, is a district of the third class, and has 3 judges. (2) The forty-fourth district consists of the cities of Royal Oak and Berkley and has 2 judges. (3) The forty-fifth district consists of the cities of Huntington Woods, Oak Park, and Pleasant Ridge and the township of Royal Oak in the county of Oakland, is a district of the third class, and has 2 judges. (4) The forty-sixth district consists of the cities of Southfield and Lathrup Village and the township of Southfield in the county of Oakland, is a district of the third class, and has 3 judges. (5) The forty-seventh district consists of the cities of Farmington and Farmington Hills, is a district of the third class, and has 2 judges. (6) The forty-eighth district consists of the cities of Birmingham, Bloomfield Hills, Sylvan Lake, Keego Harbor, and Orchard Lake Village and the townships of Bloomfield and West Bloomfield in the county of Oakland, is a district of the third class, and, subject to subsection (7), has the following number of judges: (a) Until the date determined under subdivision (b), the forty-eighth district has 3 judges. (b) The forty-eighth district has 2 judges beginning on the earlier of the following dates: (i) The date on which a vacancy occurs in the office of district judge in this district, unless the vacancy occurs after the vacating judge has been defeated in a primary or general election. (ii) The beginning date of the term for which an incumbent district judge in this district no longer seeks election or reelection to that office. (7) If each district control unit of the forty-eighth district approves the maintaining of 3 judges in the same manner as is required for an additional district judgeship under section 8175(1) and (2), subsection (6)(b) does not apply and section 8175(3) applies to the maintaining of the 3 judges. (8) (7) The fiftieth district consists of the city of Pontiac, is a district of the third class, and has the following number of judges: (a) Until the date determined under subdivision (b), 4 judges. (b) The fiftieth district has 3 judges. beginning on the earlier of the following dates: (i) The date on which a vacancy occurs in the office of district judge in this district, unless the vacancy occurs after the vacating judge has been defeated in a primary or general election. (ii) The beginning date of the term for which an incumbent district judge in this district no longer seeks election or reelection to that office. (9) (8) The fifty-first district consists of the township of Waterford in the county of Oakland, is a district of the third class, and has 2 judges. (10) (9) The fifty-second district consists of the county of Oakland except the cities of Madison Heights, Ferndale, Hazel Park, Royal Oak, Berkley, Huntington Woods, Oak Park, Pleasant Ridge, Southfield, Lathrup Village, Farmington, Farmington Hills, Northville, Sylvan Lake, Keego Harbor, Orchard Lake Village, Birmingham, Bloomfield Hills, and Pontiac and the townships of Royal Oak, Southfield, West Bloomfield, Bloomfield, and Waterford, is a district of the second class, and is divided into the following election divisions: (a) The first division consists of the cities of Novi, South Lyon, Wixom, and Walled Lake and the townships of Milford, Highland, Commerce, Lyon, and Novi and has 3 judges. (b) The second division consists of the city of the village of Clarkston and the townships of Springfield, Independence, Holly, Groveland, Brandon, Rose, and White Lake and has 2 judges. (c) The third division consists of the cities of Rochester, Auburn Hills, Rochester Hills, and Lake Angelus and the townships of Oxford, Addison, Orion, and Oakland and has 3 judges. (d) The fourth division consists of the cities of Troy and Clawson and has 2 judges.